District of Columbia statutes.
37-131.10

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement this chapter, including rules regulating the location, the design, and the maintenance of vendor carts, stands, vehicles, and other equipment, and rules requiring that persons vending from public space maintain insurance in such form and amount as may be required by the Mayor. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 60-day period of review, excluding weekends, holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, by resolution, within the 60-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed disapproved.

History

Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-71, § 11, 56 DCR 6619

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Vending Regulation Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-24, Oct. 17, 2013, 60 DCR 11102).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Vending Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-84, June 19, 2013, 60 DCR 9534, 20 DCSTAT 1439).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Vending Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-171, September 30, 2013, 60 DCR 14746).